North Dakota statutes. TITLE 61 Waters
CHAPTER 61-02 Water Commission

61-02-01.
Water conservation, flood control, management, and development declared a public purpose.

It is hereby declared that the general welfare and the protection of the lives, health, property, and the rights of all the people of this state require that the conservation, management, development, and control of waters in this state, public or private, navigable or non-navigable, surface or subsurface, the control of floods, and the management of the atmospheric resources, involve and necessitate the exercise of the sovereign powers of this state and are affected with and concern a public purpose. It is declared further that any and all exercise of sovereign powers of this state in investigating, constructing, maintaining, regulating, supervising, and controlling any system of works involving such subject matter embraces and concerns a single object, and that the state water commission in the exercise of its powers, and in the performance of all its official duties, shall be considered and construed to be performing a governmental function for the benefit, welfare, and prosperity of all the people of this state.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 1; 1939, ch. 256, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 61-0201; S.L. 1983, ch. 676, § 1; 2013, ch. 481, § 1.

Cross-References.

State water resources policy, see N.D.C.C. § 61-01-26.

Validation of acts of commission, see N.D.C.C. § 1-06-03.

Law Reviews.

An Institutional Overview of the North Dakota State Water Conservation Commission: Its Operation and Setting, Dean F. Bard and Robert E. Beck, 46 N.D. L. Rev. 31 (1970).

The Nature and Extent of Rights in Water in North Dakota, Robert E. Beck and John C. Hart, 51 N.D. L. Rev. 249 (1975).

Waterfowl Production Areas: A State Perspective, 60 N.D. L. Rev. 659 (1984).

61-02-01.1.
Statewide water development program.

The legislative assembly finds that there is a critical need to develop a comprehensive statewide water development program. The state water commission shall develop and implement a comprehensive statewide water development program. The commission shall design the program to serve the long-term water resource needs of the state and its people and to protect the state’s current usage of, and the state’s claim to, its proper share of Missouri River water.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 25, § 9.

Law Reviews.

For Note: The Future of Quantifying Tribal Water Rights in North Dakota, see 84 N.D. L. Rev. 455 (2008).

61-02-01.2.
State water commission — Policies for water retention projects.

The state water commission shall develop policies, including cost-sharing guidelines, which further the development of water retention projects for flood control. The commission shall provide a report regarding the policies to the sixty-second legislative assembly.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 592, § 1.

61-02-01.3.
Comprehensive water development plan.

Biennially, the commission shall develop and maintain a comprehensive water development plan organized on a river basin perspective, including an inventory of future water projects for budgeting and planning purposes. As part of the commission’s planning process, to facilitate local project sponsor participation and project prioritization and to assist in education regarding life cycle analyses for municipal water supply projects, and economic analyses for flood control and water conveyance projects expected to cost more than one million dollars, the commission shall develop a policy that outlines procedures for commissioner-hosted meetings within the upper Missouri River, lower Missouri River, James River, upper Red River, lower Red River, Mouse River, Devils Lake, Little Missouri River, upper Heart River, and upper Cannonball River drainage basins.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 478, § 1; 2017, ch. 419, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 489, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

61-02-01.4.
State water commission cost-share policy.

The state water commission shall review, gather stakeholder input on, and rewrite as necessary the commission’s “Cost-share Policy, Procedure and General Requirements” and “Project Prioritization Guidance” documents. The commission’s cost-share policy:

Must provide a water supply project is eligible for a cost-share up to seventy-five percent of the total eligible project costs.

May not determine program eligibility of water supply projects based on a population growth factor. However, a population growth factor may be used in prioritizing projects for that purpose.

Must consider all project costs potentially eligible for reimbursement, except the commission shall exclude operations expense, regular maintenance, and removal of vegetative materials and sediment, for assessment drains, and may exclude operations expense and regular maintenance for other projects. Snagging and clearing of watercourses and deepening or widening of existing drains are eligible for reimbursement. The commission shall require a water project sponsor to maintain a capital improvement fund from the rates charged customers for future extraordinary maintenance projects as condition of funding an extraordinary maintenance project.

May not determine program eligibility of water supply projects based on affordability. However, affordability may be used in prioritizing projects for that purpose.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 54, § 33, effective July 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 419, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 507, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 490, § 1, effective May 3, 2021.

61-02-01.5.
North Dakota outdoor heritage fund grants — Effect on local cost-share. [Repealed]

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 54, § 34, effective July 1, 2015; repealed by 2021, ch. 489, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

61-02-02.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:

“Commission” means the state water commission.

“Cost of works” includes:

The cost of construction, the cost of all lands, property rights, water rights, easements, and franchises acquired which are deemed necessary for such construction;

The cost of all water rights acquired or exercised by the commission in connection with the works;

The cost of all machinery and equipment, financing charges, interest before and during construction and for a period not exceeding three years after the completion of construction;

The cost of engineering and legal expenses, plans, specifications, surveys, estimates of cost, and other expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of a project;

Administrative expenses;

The construction of the works and the placing of the works in operation; and

Other expenses necessary or incident to the financing authorized in this chapter, including funding of debt service, repair and replacement reserves, capitalized interest, and the payment of bond issuance costs.

“Cost-share” means funds appropriated by the legislative assembly or otherwise transferred by the commission to a local entity under commission policy as reimbursement for a percentage of the total approved cost of a project approved by the commission.

“Economic analysis” means an estimate of economic benefits and direct costs that result from the development of a project.

“Grant” means a one-time sum of money appropriated by the legislative assembly and transferred by the commission to a local entity for a particular purpose. A grant is not dependent on the local entity providing a particular percentage of the cost of the project.

“Life cycle analysis” means the summation of all costs associated with the anticipated useful life of a project, including project development, land, construction, operation, maintenance, and disposal or decommissioning.

“Loan” means an amount of money lent to a sponsor of a project approved by the commission to assist with funding approved project components. A loan may be stand-alone financial assistance.

“Owner” includes all individuals, associations, corporations, limited liability companies, districts, municipalities, and other political subdivisions of this state having any title or interest in any properties, rights, water rights, easements, or franchises to be acquired.

“Project” means any one of the works defined in subsection 10, or any combination of such works, which are physically connected or jointly managed and operated as a single unit.

“Water conveyance project” means any assessment drain, streambank stabilization, or snagging and clearing of water courses.

“Works” includes:

All property rights, easements, and franchises relating to and deemed necessary or convenient for their operation;

All water rights acquired and exercised by the commission in connection with such works;

All means of conserving and distributing water, including reservoirs, dams, diversion canals, distributing canals, channels, lateral ditches, pumping units, mains, pipelines, treatment plants, and waterworks systems; and

All works for the conservation, control, development, storage, treatment, distribution, and utilization of water, including works for the purpose of irrigation, flood control, watering stock, supplying water for public, domestic, industrial, and recreational use, fire protection, and the draining of lands injured or in danger of injury as a result of such water utilization.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 2; 1939, ch. 256, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 61-0202; S.L. 1963, ch. 417, § 4; 1983, ch. 676, § 2; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1999, ch. 535, § 2; 2017, ch. 19, § 17, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 419, § 3, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 507, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

Cross-References.

Word defined by statute always has same meaning, see N.D.C.C. § 1-01-09.

61-02-03.
Apportioning or allocating water rights by commission.

In case any water rights shall be acquired or exercised by the commission in connection with two or more works and projects, the commission, by resolution, shall apportion or allocate to each of such works or projects such part of such water rights as it may determine, and upon adoption of such a resolution, such water rights shall be deemed to be a part of each of such works and projects to the extent that such water rights have been so apportioned or allocated thereto respectively.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 2, subs. f; 1939, ch. 256, § 2, subs. f; R.C. 1943, § 61-0203.

Law Reviews.

For Note: The Future of Quantifying Tribal Water Rights in North Dakota, see 84 N.D. L. Rev. 455 (2008).

61-02-04.
State water commission — Members — Terms — Qualifications.

The state water commission consists of the governor, agriculture commissioner, and eight other members appointed by the governor who shall take into account reasonable geographic considerations in making the appointments with the intent of having each of the eight major drainage basins represented by a commissioner who resides in the basin. The major drainage basins are the upper Missouri River basin; the lower Missouri River basin; the James River basin; the upper Red River basin; the lower Red River basin; the Mouse River basin; the Devils Lake basin; and the Little Missouri River, upper Heart River, and upper Cannonball River basin. The governor or the agriculture commissioner, or both, may appoint a representative to serve in that official’s capacity at meetings that official is unable to attend. The eight appointive members of the commission must be appointed for a term of six years each with the terms of office so arranged that not more than four terms expire on the first day of July of each odd-numbered year. Each appointive member must be a qualified elector of the state and is subject to removal by judicial procedure. In case of a vacancy, the vacancy must be filled by appointment by the governor for the remainder of the unexpired term. Before entering upon the discharge of official duties, each appointive member shall take, subscribe, and file with the secretary of state the oath prescribed for civil officers.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 3; 1939, ch. 256, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 61-0204; S.L. 1949, ch. 344, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 61-0204; S.L. 1961, ch. 332, § 25; 1963, ch. 417, § 5; 1967, ch. 74, § 20; 1981, ch. 626, § 1; 1983, ch. 676, § 3; 1991, ch. 698, § 1; 2017, ch. 419, § 4, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 507, § 3, effective August 1, 2019.

Cross-References.

Governor’s power to appoint majority of members of commission, see N.D.C.C. § 54-07-01.2.

Oath required of civil officers, see N.D. Const., art. XI, § 4; N.D.C.C. § 44-01-05.

61-02-04.1.
Conflict of interest.

A member of the commission who has a direct or indirect personal or pecuniary interest in a matter before the commission must disclose that fact to the commission and may not participate in or vote on that particular matter.

Sections 12.1-13-02, 12.1-13-03, and 48-01.2-08 do not apply to contracts in which a member of the commission is directly or indirectly interested if the requirements of subsection 1 have been met.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 563, § 1; 2007, ch. 403, § 17.

61-02-05.
Chairman of commission.

The governor is the chairman of the commission. The governor shall designate a vice chairman from the members of the commission. The director of the department of water resources is the secretary of the commission.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 3; 1939, ch. 256, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 61-0205; S.L. 1983, ch. 676, § 4; 2021, ch. 488, § 31, effective August 1, 2021.

Cross-References.

Chief engineer and secretary of commission, state engineer as, see N.D.C.C. § 61-03-01.

61-02-06.
Principal and branch offices of commission.

The commission shall maintain its principal office in the city of Bismarck and may maintain such branch offices in the state as it may determine.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 4; 1939, ch. 256, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 61-0206.

61-02-07.
Quorum — What constitutes.

A majority of the members of the commission constitutes a quorum, and the affirmative or negative vote of six members is necessary to bind the commission except for adjournment.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 4; 1939, ch. 256, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 61-0207; S.L. 1949, ch. 344, § 2; 1957 Supp., § 61-0207; S.L. 1983, ch. 676, § 5; 2017, ch. 419, § 5, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 507, § 4, effective August 1, 2019.

61-02-08.
Meetings of commission.

The commission shall hold at least one meeting every two months at places as it, by resolution, may provide. The governor shall serve as chairman, and the commission shall select a member of the commission to serve as vice chairman. The chairman, or in the chairman’s absence or disability, the vice chairman of the commission, may issue a call for any meeting at any time. The governor or governor’s appointed representative shall preside at all meetings of the commission, and in case of the absence or disability of the governor and governor’s appointed representative, the vice chairman shall preside.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 4; 1939, ch. 256, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 61-0208; S.L. 1983, ch. 676, § 6; 1997, ch. 513, § 1; 2017, ch. 419, § 6, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 19, § 18, effective August 1, 2017.

Cross-References.

Meetings of public agencies open to public, see N.D. Const., art. XI, § 5; §§ 44-04-19 to 44-04-21.

61-02-09.
Commission a state agency — Function as state.

The commission shall be a state agency with all of the powers and authority possessed by such a state agency in the performance of its duties. The commission may sue and be sued, plead and be impleaded, and contract and be contracted with. The commission in the exercise of all its powers and in the performance of all its duties shall be the state of North Dakota functioning in its sovereign and governmental capacity.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 5; 1939, ch. 256, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 61-0209; S.L. 1981, ch. 627, § 14; 2013, ch. 479, § 1.

61-02-10.
Commission to have seal — Judicial notice.

The commission shall have a seal bearing its name. Such seal shall be affixed to such records and other instruments as the commission may direct, and all courts shall take judicial notice thereof.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 5; 1939, ch. 256, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 61-0210.

Cross-References.

Judicial notice, see N.D.R.Ev. 201.

61-02-11.
Commission may adopt rules and regulations — Record kept by commission — Inspection.

The commission may adopt and enact all rules, regulations, resolutions, and bylaws deemed suitable and necessary in the conduct of its business and the performance of its duties. It shall keep accurate minutes and records of all its acts which at all reasonable times shall be open for public inspection and which it may cause to be published as it may deem desirable.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 5; 1939, ch. 256, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 61-0211.

Cross-References.

Procedure for adoption and publication of administrative rules, see N.D.C.C. §§ 28-32-02 to 28-32-14.

61-02-12.
Compensation and expenses of appointive members of commission.

Each appointive member of the commission is entitled to receive compensation per day in the amount provided for members of the legislative management under section 54-35-10 and must be reimbursed for expenses in the amounts provided in sections 44-08-04 and 54-06-09 while attending meetings of the commission or, at the discretion of the member, may receive either per diem compensation or expenses in those amounts while otherwise engaged in official business of the commission, including time of travel between home and the place at which the member performs such duties.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 6; 1939, ch. 256, § 6; R.C. 1943, § 61-0212; S.L. 1963, ch. 417, § 6; 1973, ch. 498, § 1; 1993, ch. 592, § 1; 1997, ch. 432, § 31; 2011, ch. 491, § 1.

61-02-13.
Employment of assistants.

The commission may hire and employ all necessary aid, help, and assistants, including members of all the professions, for the efficient performance of its powers and duties.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 7; 1939, ch. 256, § 7; R.C. 1943, § 61-0213; S.L. 1959, ch. 372, § 116; 1983, ch. 676, § 7.

61-02-14.
Powers and duties of the commission.

The commission is authorized:

To investigate, plan, regulate, undertake, construct, establish, maintain, control, operate, and supervise all works, dams, and projects, public and private, which in the commission’s judgment may be necessary or advisable:

To control the low-water flow of streams in the state.

To impound water for the improvement of municipal, industrial, and rural water supplies.

To control and regulate floodflow in the streams of the state to minimize the damage of floodwaters.

To conserve and develop the waters within the natural watershed areas of the state and, subject to vested rights, to divert the waters within a watershed area to another watershed area and the waters of any river, lake, or stream into another river, lake, or stream.

To improve the channels of the streams for more efficient transportation of the available water in the streams.

To provide sufficient water flow for the abatement of stream pollution.

To develop, restore, and stabilize the waters of the state for domestic, agricultural, and municipal needs; irrigation; flood control; recreation; and wildlife conservation by the construction and maintenance of dams, reservoirs, and diversion canals.

To promote the maintenance of existing drainage channels in agricultural lands and to construct needed channels.

To provide more satisfactory subsurface water supplies for the state’s municipalities.

To finance the construction, establishment, and extraordinary maintenance of public works, dams, and irrigation projects, which in the commission’s judgment may be necessary and advisable. The commission may not provide a cost-share for the costs of operation, regular maintenance, or removal of vegetative materials and sediment, for assessment drains. Snagging and clearing of watercourses are not regular maintenance.

To provide for the storage, development, diversion, delivery, and distribution of water for the irrigation of agricultural land and supply water for municipal and industrial purposes.

To provide for the drainage of lands injured by or susceptible of injury from excessive rainfall or from the utilization of irrigation water, and subject to the limitations prescribed by law, to aid and cooperate with the United States and any department, agency, or officer of the United States, and with any county, township, drainage district, or irrigation district of this state, or of another state, in the construction or improvement of the drains.

To provide water for stock.

To provide water for the generation of electric power and for mining and manufacturing purposes.

To define, declare, and establish rules and regulations:

For the sale of waters and water rights to individuals, associations, corporations, limited liability companies, municipalities, and other political subdivisions of the state and for the delivery of water to users.

For the full and complete supervision, regulation, and control of the water supplies within the state.

To exercise full power and control of the construction, operation, and maintenance of works and the collection of rates, charges, and revenues realized from the works.

To sell, lease, and otherwise distribute all waters which may be developed, impounded, and diverted by the commission under this chapter, for the purposes of irrigation, the development of power, and the watering of livestock, and for any other private or public use.

To exercise all express and implied rights, power, and authority that may be necessary, and to do, perform, and carry out the expressed purposes of this chapter and the purposes reasonably implied incidentally to or lawfully connected with the expressed purposes of this chapter.

To acquire, own, and develop lands for irrigation and water conservation and to acquire, own, and develop damsites and reservoir sites and to acquire easements and rights of way for diversion and distributing systems.

To cooperate with the United States and any department, agency, or officer of the United States in the planning, establishment, operation, and maintenance of dams, reservoirs, diversion and distributing systems, for the utilization of the waters of the state for domestic, municipal, and industrial needs, irrigation, flood control, water conservation, and generation of electric power and for mining, agricultural, and manufacturing purposes. The commission may, within the limitations prescribed by law, acquire, convey, contribute, or grant to the United States, moneys, real and personal property, including land or easements for dams and reservoir sites and rights of way and easements for diversion and distribution systems or participate in the cost of any project.

To consider cost-sharing for water quality improvement projects.

Governing and providing for financing by local participants to the maximum extent deemed practical and equitable in any water development project in which the state participates in cooperation with the United States or with political subdivisions or local entities.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 8; 1939, ch. 256, § 8; R.C. 1943, § 61-0214; S.L. 1945, ch. 328, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 61-0214; S.L. 1963, ch. 417, § 7; 1965, ch. 446, § 2; 1975, ch. 575, § 2; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2001, ch. 22, § 13; 2017, ch. 419, § 7, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 507, § 5, effective August 1, 2019.

Cross-References.

Procedure for adoption and publication of administrative rules, see N.D.C.C. §§ 28-32-02 to 28-32-14.

Southwest pipeline project, construction, operation and maintenance by commission, see N.D.C.C. § 61-24.3-10.

Law Reviews.

For Note: The Future of Quantifying Tribal Water Rights in North Dakota, see 84 N.D. L. Rev. 455 (2008).

North Dakota Law Review: Energy Symposium: Article: Water Resources and Oil and Gas Development: A Survey of North Dakota Law, 87 N.D. L. Rev. 507 (2011).

61-02-14.1.
Release or assignment of easements — Procedure.

The commission may, when it deems such action to be in the best interests of the state, for good and valuable consideration, release easements granted to the state for the construction, operation, and maintenance of dams, along with access thereto, if such dams have not been constructed within ten years of the granting of the easement or if such dams are no longer useful. The commission may also assign such easements to a political subdivision if it determines the assignment would be in the best interests of the state. Any release or assignment shall be in the name of the state of North Dakota by the governor and attested by the secretary of state.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 567, § 1; 2003, ch. 550, § 1.

61-02-14.2.
Commission contracts may be executed by director.

The director of the department of water resources, or the director’s authorized designee, may execute contracts approved by the commission.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 492, § 1; 2021, ch. 488, § 32, effective August 1, 2021.

61-02-14.3.
Commission agreements — Terms, conditions, and reapplication.

An agreement for funding which is approved by the commission to fund a water project under this chapter must require a progress report to the commission at least every four years if the term of the project exceeds four years. If a progress report is not timely received or, if after a review of a progress report, the commission determines the project has not made sufficient progress, the commission may terminate the agreement for project funding. The project sponsor may submit a new application to the commission for funding for a project for which the commission previously terminated funding.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 419, § 8, effective August 1, 2017.

61-02-14.4.
Carryover projects — Reporting requirements to the legislative management.

The state water commission shall report quarterly to a legislative committee designated by the legislative management:

Each project the state water commission has designated as a carryover project that has had a cost-share agreement in place for at least four years;

The amount of funds still committed for each carryover project included in the report;

The total amount of funds reallocated or made available from carryover projects included in a previous report to other projects since the commission’s preceding report; and

The status of each carryover project for which the committee has made a recommendation under subsection 2 since the commission’s preceding report.

The legislative committee designated by the legislative management to receive the state water commission’s reports may make a recommendation to the state water commission that a carryover project included in a report be terminated under section 61-02-14.3 and any funds remaining for the carryover project be reallocated and made available for projects with the same general purpose as the carryover project.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 20, § 6, effective April 28, 2021.

61-02-15.
Provisions of chapter not to limit or deprive state department of health of authority. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 575, § 2.

61-02-16.
Preference is given to individual farmer or irrigation district when planning or constructing irrigation projects.

In planning and constructing irrigation projects, it shall be the policy of the commission to give preference to the individual farmer or groups of farmers or irrigation districts who intend to farm the land themselves.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 8; 1939, ch. 256, § 8; R.C. 1943, § 61-0216.

61-02-17.
Records, accounts, and statements of works and projects undertaken — Filed with office of management and budget.

The commission shall keep full and complete accounts and records of all matters and things relating to works and projects undertaken, established, and maintained by the commission and shall prepare annual balance sheets, income, and profit and loss statements, showing the financial condition of each project, and shall file copies thereof with the office of management and budget for public inspection at all reasonable times by any interested parties or citizens of the state.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 8; 1939, ch. 256, § 8; R.C. 1943, § 61-0217; S.L. 1983, ch. 676, § 8.

61-02-18.
Application for irrigation project — Fees to accompany — Surveys made.

Upon application by any landowner, holder of any easement, or holder of any lease of five or more years’ duration, or of any group or association of such landowners, easement holders, or leaseholders for an irrigation project, the commission shall make such preliminary engineering, soil survey, and other investigations as may be necessary to determine the feasibility of any such proposed project. Such applicant shall submit with the application such fees as the commission shall establish for projects of different classes. Following such preliminary survey and upon further application by the applicant, the commission shall enter into a contract with such applicant for a complete engineering, soil survey, and other investigations of said project. The soil survey shall meet such standards as are prescribed by the bureau of chemistry and soils of the federal government and the North Dakota state university of agriculture and applied science. The engineering survey shall be of sufficient detail and quality to enable the applicant to comply with the requirements for obtaining a permit to appropriate water, and to enable any competent contractor to estimate costs and quantities of material needed within reasonable limits, and to install such project without further engineering service. The contract for such engineering service between the applicant and the commission shall require the commission to pay not more than seventy-five percent of the cost of such detailed engineering survey and the drawing of the necessary plans and specifications, with not less than twenty-five percent to be paid by the applicant.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 8; 1939, ch. 256, § 8; R.C. 1943, § 61-0218.

61-02-19.
Works of commission may include preparation of land for irrigation when project undertaken by commission.

In any irrigation project undertaken by the commission serving a single individual, or a group of individuals owning irrigable lands, the works of the commission may include preparation of the land for irrigation.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 8; 1939, ch. 256, § 8; R.C. 1943, § 61-0219.

61-02-20.
Approval of commission necessary before constructing certain size dams — Inspection during construction. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 365, § 8.

61-02-21.
Sewage and waste disposal or discharge — Water supply plant — Approval of commission required. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 575, § 2.

61-02-22.
Acquisition of necessary property and power of condemnation.

The commission has full power and authority to acquire by purchase or exchange, upon such terms and conditions as the commission determines necessary and proper, and by condemnation in accordance with and subject to chapter 32-15 and the provisions of all laws applicable to the condemnation of property for public use, any lands, rights, water rights of whatever character, easements, franchises, and other property determined necessary or proper for the construction, operation, and maintenance of works. This chapter does not require the commission, in condemning any riparian water right, to condemn also the riparian land to which such right may be incident. The title to all property purchased, acquired, or condemned must be taken in the name of the commission and held in trust for, and for the use and benefit of, the people of this state.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 10; 1939, ch. 256, § 10; R.C. 1943, § 61-0222; 2007, ch. 293, § 38.

Cross-References.

Eminent domain, see N.D.C.C. ch. 32-15.

61-02-23.
Actions to acquire property rights.

The commission shall have full power and authority:

To institute, maintain, and prosecute to final determination in any of the courts of this or any other state, or in any of the federal courts, any and all actions, suits, and special proceedings that may be necessary:

To enable it to acquire, own, and develop lands for irrigation and water conservation, water distribution, and other necessary purposes. The commission may sell such lands upon such terms and conditions as it may prescribe and may own and hold title to lands for damsites, reservoir sites, water rights, easements, and rights of way for diversion and distributing systems, lateral ditches, and other means for the distribution of waters in this state, and for any other necessary purposes.

To adjudicate all water rights upon any stream, watercourse, or source of water supply from which are derived the waters for such reservoir, diversion and distributing systems, lateral ditches, and other means of distribution.

To join in any action any and all owners of vested water rights acquired by any person, association, corporation, or limited liability company, so that adjudication may be had of all surplus water upon all of the watercourses and sources, water supplies or any project constructed under the supervision and control of the commission.

To join all persons interested as parties in all actions or condemnation proceedings affecting the title of, or holding liens upon, the property sought to be acquired as disclosed by the public records, and the court in such actions or special proceedings shall implead all parties necessary for a full and final determination of all issues upon their merits for the partition and distribution of damages awarded. In the event of controversy between such parties, the court may direct the amount of damages awarded to be paid in or deposited with the clerk of court to abide the result of further appropriate proceedings either in law or in equity. The taking possession of property sought to be condemned shall not be delayed by reason of any dispute between rival claimants or the failure to join any of them as parties to such action or condemnation proceedings.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 10; 1939, ch. 256, § 10; R.C. 1943, § 61-0223; S.L. 1963, ch. 417, § 8; 1993, ch. 54, § 106.

61-02-23.1.
Condemnation by the water commission.

Whenever a right of way is to be taken by condemnation proceedings for any purpose authorized by chapters 61-24.3 or 61-24.6, the commission may take possession of the right of way after making a written offer to purchase and depositing the amount of the offer with the clerk of the district court of the county wherein the right of way is located. The clerk shall immediately notify the property owner in writing of the deposit. Within thirty days after receiving notice, the property owner may appeal to the district court by serving notice of appeal upon the water commission and the matter must be tried at the next term of court with a jury, unless a jury is waived, in the manner prescribed for trials under chapter 32-15.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 746, § 1; 1999, ch. 543, § 1.

61-02-23.2.
Devils Lake outlet — Eminent domain — Design and build construction.

In the construction of an outlet from Devils Lake, the commission:

Shall make a reasonable and diligent effort to acquire the property interests needed by negotiation. The commission is deemed to have made a reasonable and diligent effort if it has contacted or attempted to contact the owner of the property interest needed at least three times over a thirty-day period. If the commission is unable to acquire the interest needed by negotiation, then it may take possession of the interests needed after making a written offer to purchase and depositing the amount of the offer with the clerk of the district court of the county in which the property interest is located. The amount of the offer must be at least the average value per acre of comparable property. The clerk shall immediately notify the property owner in writing of the deposit. Within thirty days after receiving notice, the property owner may appeal to district court by serving notice of appeal upon the commission and the matter must be tried in the manner prescribed under chapter 32-15.

May issue, when it determines that it would be advantageous to the state or that it is necessary in order to construct the outlet in a timely manner, a request for proposals to design and build the outlet. The request for proposals must require that each proposal submitted contain a single price that includes the cost to design and build the outlet. Neither chapter 48-01.2 or 54-44.7, nor any other law requiring competitive bidding applies to the construction of the outlet if the commission determines to use the design and build procedure. The commission shall select the proposal that it determines is the most advantageous to the state.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 562, § 2; 2001, ch. 22, § 12; 2007, ch. 403, § 18.

61-02-23.3.
Construction and operation of the Devils Lake outlet — Authorization — Agreement.

The state water commission may do all things reasonably necessary to construct an outlet from Devils Lake, including executing an agreement with the federal government in which the state water commission agrees to hold the United States harmless and free from damages, except for damages due to the fault or negligence of the United States or its contractors. The director of the department of water resources may employ full-time personnel and other personnel as necessary for the operation and maintenance of the Devils Lake outlet within the limits of legislative appropriations for that purpose. Notwithstanding section 61-02-64.1, funds disbursed from the contract fund and appropriated for the purposes of this section may be used for salaries, equipment, operations, and maintenance costs relating to the Devils Lake outlet.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 43, § 12; 2005, ch. 21, § 11; 2021, ch. 488, § 33, effective August 1, 2021.

61-02-24.
Cooperation and coordination with all existing agencies.

The commission may investigate, plan, cooperate, and make all contracts or compacts necessary or requisite:

With the United States and any department, agency, or officer thereof.

With the states of Minnesota, South Dakota, Montana, and Wyoming, or any political subdivision thereof, and with any other state, and with any department or officer or political subdivision of any state.

With Canada or any of its provinces, and with any agency, department, or officer of Canada or any of its provinces.

The powers granted by this section shall extend to all waters, whether considered as intrastate, interstate, or international. The commission is specially authorized and empowered to cooperate with the United States or any of its agencies concerned with investigating, planning, conserving, utilizing, developing, and handling water in any form for purposes of water conservation, flood control, prevention of water pollution, or soil reclamation, or with any other resources of the state, and concerned with the administration of the public works program of the state or any part thereof. The commission is authorized to act and to contract fully with the United States, or with any department, agency, or officer thereof, with full power of purchase, sale, or lease to carry out, develop, or administer any federal project within this state or partly within the state, and also to accept and to use any funds provided by the United States or any agency thereof for any such purposes.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 255, § 11; 1939, ch. 256, § 11; 1941, ch. 300, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 61-0224; S.L. 1963, ch. 417, § 9; 1983, ch. 676, § 9.